incubator/apertium-hi.hi.dix
    <pardef n="लडक्/ई__न्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ई</l>
          <r>ई<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इयाँ</l>
          <r>ई<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ई</l>
          <r>ई<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इयों</l>
          <r>ई<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="आजादी/__न्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ई<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ई<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ई<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ई<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ऋतु/__न्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ई<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>एँ</l>
          <r>ई<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ई<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r>ई<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="वायु/__न्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ई<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ई<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ई<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ई<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="बह्/ऊ__न्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऊ</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उएँ</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उयें</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऊ</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उओं</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="बालू/__न्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="लौ/__न्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>एँ</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>वों</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="सरसों/__न्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="माँ/__न्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>यें</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="घर्/अ__न्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अ</l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अ</l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अ</l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="खर्च्/अ__न्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अ</l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अ</l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="क्रोध/__न्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="अडबंग"><i>अडबंग्</i><par n="खर्च्/अ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="अग्निवधू"><i>अग्निवधू</i><par n="बालू/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="अहं"><i>अहं</i><par n="सरसों/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="अम्माँ"><i>अम्माँ</i><par n="माँ/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="अमृतांशु"><i>अमृतांशु</i><par n="वायु/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="अनुप्राणन"><i>अनुप्राणन</i><par n="क्रोध/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="अनुषंग"><i>अनुषंग्</i><par n="घर्/अ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="अतिमृत्यु"><i>अतिमृत्यु</i><par n="वायु/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="अधातु"><i>अधातु</i><par n="ऋतु/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="अधैर्य"><i>अधैर्य</i><par n="क्रोध/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="अद्वार"><i>अद्वार्</i><par n="घर्/अ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="आयु"><i>आयु</i><par n="वायु/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="बाहु"><i>बाहु</i><par n="ऋतु/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="बालू"><i>बालू</i><par n="बालू/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="बत्ती"><i>बत्त्</i><par n="लडक्/ई__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="बदबू"><i>बदबू</i><par n="बालू/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="बदलाई"><i>बदलाई</i><par n="आजादी/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="बधू"><i>बध्</i><par n="बह्/ऊ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="भ्रू"><i>भ्र्</i><par n="बह्/ऊ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="बू"><i>बू</i><par n="बालू/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="चूडी"><i>चूड्</i><par n="लडक्/ई__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="ढलवाँ"><i>ढलवाँ</i><par n="माँ/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="ढलुआँ"><i>ढलुआँ</i><par n="माँ/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="एजंसी"><i>एजंसी</i><par n="आजादी/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="घरेलू"><i>घरेलू</i><par n="बालू/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="गौ"><i>गौ</i><par n="लौ/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="गोपद"><i>गोपद्</i><par n="घर्/अ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="गुफ्तगू"><i>गुफ्तगू</i><par n="बालू/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="हनु"><i>हनु</i><par n="ऋतु/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="हविर्भू"><i>हविर्भ्</i><par n="बह्/ऊ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="हथफेर"><i>हथफेर</i><par n="क्रोध/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="होमधेनु"><i>होमधेनु</i><par n="ऋतु/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="इलेक्ट्रिसिटी"><i>इलेक्ट्रिसिटी</i><par n="आजादी/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="इमली"><i>इमल्</i><par n="लडक्/ई__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="जानु"><i>जानु</i><par n="वायु/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="जोरू"><i>जोर्</i><par n="बह्/ऊ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="खर्च"><i>खर्च्</i><par n="खर्च्/अ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="कर्ज"><i>कर्ज्</i><par n="खर्च्/अ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="कसाकसी"><i>कसाकसी</i><par n="आजादी/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="खोजू"><i>खोजू</i><par n="बालू/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="कोली"><i>कोल्</i><par n="लडक्/ई__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="कृषक"><i>कृषक्</i><par n="घर्/अ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="खुशबू"><i>खुशब्</i><par n="बह्/ऊ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="लौ"><i>लौ</i><par n="लौ/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="लू"><i>लू</i><par n="बालू/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="मगहीपान"><i>मगहीपान</i><par n="क्रोध/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="मजदुरी"><i>मजदुरी</i><par n="आजादी/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="माँगचोटी"><i>माँगचोट्</i><par n="लडक्/ई__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="माँ"><i>माँ</i><par n="माँ/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="मिश्रधातु"><i>मिश्रधातु</i><par n="ऋतु/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="नवलवधू"><i>नवलवध्</i><par n="बह्/ऊ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="नवराष्ट्र"><i>नवराष्ट्र्</i><par n="घर्/अ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="नवधातु"><i>नवधातु</i><par n="ऋतु/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="नेकनमी"><i>नेकनमी</i><par n="आजादी/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="पांचों"><i>पांचों</i><par n="सरसों/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="पराधीन"><i>पराधीन</i><par n="क्रोध/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="पर्वतवासिनी"><i>पर्वतवासिन्</i><par n="लडक्/ई__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="प्राणवायु"><i>प्राणवायु</i><par n="वायु/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रियपात्र"><i>प्रियपात्र्</i><par n="घर्/अ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="पुत्रवधू"><i>पुत्रवध्</i><par n="बह्/ऊ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="रज्जु"><i>रज्जु</i><par n="ऋतु/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="रासेश्वरी"><i>रासेश्वरी</i><par n="आजादी/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="रेणु"><i>रेणु</i><par n="वायु/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="रोमन"><i>रोमन</i><par n="क्रोध/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="साडी"><i>साड्</i><par n="लडक्/ई__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="सं"><i>सं</i><par n="सरसों/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="सां"><i>सां</i><par n="सरसों/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="सरसों"><i>सरसों</i><par n="सरसों/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="स्पेशल"><i>स्पेशल्</i><par n="घर्/अ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="शृंगनाद"><i>शृंगनाद</i><par n="क्रोध/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="सूकरी"><i>सूकर्</i><par n="लडक्/ई__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="स्वयं"><i>स्वयं</i><par n="सरसों/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="उपपत्नी"><i>उपपत्नी</i><par n="आजादी/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="वायु"><i>वायु</i><par n="वायु/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="विवाहसंबंध"><i>विवाहसंबंध्</i><par n="घर्/अ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="ताँत"><i>ताँत</i><par n="क्रोध/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="तेरहीं"><i>तेरहीं</i><par n="सरसों/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="तृणकुटी"><i>तृणकुट्</i><par n="लडक्/ई__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="दवादारू"><i>दवादार्</i><par n="बह्/ऊ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="धेनु"><i>धेनु</i><par n="ऋतु/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="दिलेरी"><i>दिलेरी</i><par n="आजादी/__न्"/></e>
